tables/kannada.cti
# This table contains braille codes and rules for Kannada  script.
#
# Copyright (C) 2014 National Institute for Visually Handicapped, 116, Rajpur Road, Dehradun, Uttrakhand, India
# Copyright (C) 2024 Compass Braille, UK. <https://compassbraille.org/>
#
# This file is part of liblouis.
#
# liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
# under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
# published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
# License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
# WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with liblouis. If not, see
# <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# This table is built and maintained under an activity of Braille Council of India
# Contributors: Dipendra Manocha, Sreeja, Dinesh Kaushal, Mesar Hameed, Jake Kyle
# Updated 4th March 2024 by Jake Kyle of Compass Braille, UK, at the request of
# Dipendra Manocha in accordance with new rules published by the Braille Council
# of India in document entitled:
# "Revised Bharati Braille Kannada Alphabet Chart With Unicode"
# (see <http://liblouis.io/braille-specs/indian-languages/kannada/>)
# To report any bugs or any suggestion, please write to d@saksham.org, sreeja.param@gmail.com
# or jake@compassbraille.org

include braille-patterns.cti

# signs
letter   \x0C82	56	# KANNADA SIGN ANUSVARA
letter   \x0C83	6	# KANNADA SIGN VISARGA
letter   \x0CBC	5	# KANNADA SIGN NUKTA
noback letter   \x0CBD 2 # KANNADA SIGN AVAGRAHA - not in common use, dot 2 more likely comma in backtranslation

# vowels
letter   \x0C85	1	# KANNADA LETTER A
letter   \x0C86	345	# KANNADA LETTER AA
letter   \x0C87	24	# KANNADA LETTER I
letter   \x0C88	35	# KANNADA LETTER II
letter   \x0C89	136	# KANNADA LETTER U
letter   \x0C8A	1256	# KANNADA LEETER UU
letter   \x0C8B	5-1235	# KANNADA LETTER VOCALIC R
letter   \x0CE0	6-1235	# KANNADA LETTER VOCALIC RR
letter   \x0C8E	26	# KANNADA LETTER E
letter   \x0C8F	15	# KANNADA LETTER EE
letter   \x0C90	34	# KANNADA LETTER AI
letter   \x0C92	1346	# KANNADA LETTER O
letter   \x0C93	135	# KANNADA LETTER OO
letter   \x0C94	246	# KANNADA LETTER AU

replace \x200D

# consonants

letter   \x0C95	13	# KANNADA LETTER KA
letter   \x0C96	46	# KANNADA LETTER KHA
letter   \x0C97	1245	# KANNADA LETTER GA
letter   \x0C98	126	# KANNADA LETTER GHA
letter   \x0C99	346	# KANNADA LETTER NGA

letter   \x0C9A	14	# KANNADA LETTER CA
letter   \x0C9B	16	# KANNADA LETTER CHA
letter   \x0C9C	245	# KANNADA LETTER JA
letter   \x0C9D	356	# KANNADA LETTER JHA
letter   \x0C9E	25	# KANNADA LETTER NYA

letter   \x0C9F	23456	# KANNADA LETTER TTA
letter   \x0CA0	2456	# KANNADA LETTER TTHA
letter   \x0CA1	1246	# KANNADA LETTER DDA
letter   \x0CA2	123456	# KANNADA LETTER DDHA
noback letter   \x0CA3	3456	# KANNADA LETTER NNA - same dots as number sign so extra passes needed for backtranslation - see below

letter   \x0CA4	2345	# KANNADA LETTER TA
letter   \x0CA5	1456	# KANNADA LETTER THA
letter   \x0CA6	145	# KANNADA LETTER DA
letter   \x0CA7	2346	# KANNADA LETTER DHA
letter   \x0CA8	1345	# KANNADA LETTER NA

letter   \x0CAA	1234	# KANNADA LETTER PA
letter   \x0CAB	235	# KANNADA LETTER PHA
letter   \x0CAC	12	# KANNADA LETTER BA
letter   \x0CAD	45	# KANNADA LETTER BHA
letter   \x0CAE	134	# KANNADA LETTER MA

letter   \x0CAF	13456	# KANNADA LETTER YA
letter   \x0CB0	1235	# KANNADA LETTER RA
letter   \x0CB1 12456 # KANNADA LETTER RRA - not in common use
letter   \x0CB2	123	# KANNADA LETTER LA
letter   \x0CB3	456	# KANNADA LETTER LLA
letter   \x0CB5	1236	# KANNADA LETTER VA
letter   \x0CB6	146	# KANNADA LETTER SHA
letter   \x0CB7	12346	# KANNADA LETTER SSA
letter   \x0CB8	234	# KANNADA LETTER SA
letter   \x0CB9	125	# KANNADA LETTER HA

# vowel signs
letter   \x0CBE	345	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN AA
letter   \x0CBF	24	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN I
letter   \x0CC0	35	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN II = OCBF ?  0CD5 ?
letter   \x0CC1	136	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN U
letter   \x0CC2	1256	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN UU
letter   \x0CC3	5-1235	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC R
letter   \x0CC4	6-1235	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC RR
letter   \x0CC6	26	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN E
letter   \x0CC7	15	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN EE = 0CC6 ? 0CD5 ?
letter   \x0CC8	34	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN AI =  0CC6 ? 0CD6 ?
letter   \x0CCA	1346	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN O = 0CC6 ?  0CD6 ?
letter   \x0CCB	135	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN OO = 0CCA ? 0CD5 ?
letter   \x0CCC	246	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN AU

letter   \x0CCD	4	# KANNADA SIGN VIRAMA (PREFERRED NAME IS HALANT)
noback letter   \x0CDE 5-456 # KANNADA LETTER FA (OBSOLETE HISTORIC LETTER) AND (NAME IS A MISTAKE FOR LLLA)

letter   \x20B9	4-1235-136	# INDIAN RUPEE SIGN

# Use custom characters and virtual dots to help with back translation.

# 3456 is letter 'NNA' and the number sign.
letter \xE020 9a # custom character set to virtual dot pattern to use in pass2 of backtranslation
nofor pass2 $l[@3456] @9a # if 3456 in middle of word, change to virtual dot otherwise it will be number sign.
nofor correct "\xE020" "\x0CA3" # correct custom character to 'NNA' after backtranslation

# 124 can be digit 6 if part of a number or the contraction for sound FA.
letter \xE021 124 # custom character set to 124. Where 124 cannot be number 6, 124 will backtranslate to this character.
nofor correct "\xE021" "\x0CAB\x0CBC" # correct custom character to 'FA' after backtranslation

#digits
digit   \x0CE6	245	# KANNADA DIGIT ZERO
digit   \x0CE7	1	# KANNADA DIGIT ONE
digit   \x0CE8	12	# KANNADA DIGIT TWO
digit   \x0CE9	14	# KANNADA DIGIT THREE
digit  \x0CEA	145	# KANNADA DIGIT FOUR
digit   \x0CEB 	15	# KANNADA DIGIT FIVE
digit   \x0CEC	124	# KANNADA DIGIT SIX
digit   \x0CED	1245	# KANNADA DIGIT SEVEN
digit  \x0CEE	125	# KANNADA DIGIT EIGHT
digit   \x0CEF	24	# KANNADA DIGIT NINE
litdigit   \x0CE6	245	# KANNADA DIGIT ZERO
litdigit   \x0CE7	1	# KANNADA DIGIT ONE
litdigit   \x0CE8	12	# KANNADA DIGIT TWO
litdigit   \x0CE9	14	# KANNADA DIGIT THREE
litdigit  \x0CEA	145	# KANNADA DIGIT FOUR
litdigit   \x0CEB 	15	# KANNADA DIGIT FIVE
litdigit   \x0CEC	124	# KANNADA DIGIT SIX
litdigit   \x0CED	1245	# KANNADA DIGIT SEVEN
litdigit  \x0CEE	125	# KANNADA DIGIT EIGHT
litdigit   \x0CEF	24	# KANNADA DIGIT NINE


# Half characters 
always   \x0C95\x0CCD	4-13	# KANNADA LETTER KA
always   \x0C96\x0CCD	 4-46         # KANNADA LETTER KHA
always   \x0C97\x0CCD 4-1245	# KANNADA LETTER GA
always   \x0C98\x0CCD  4-126	# KANNADA LETTER GHA
always   \x0C99\x0CCD	4-346	# KANNADA LETTER NGA

always   \x0C9A\x0CCD	4-14	# KANNADA LETTER CA
always   \x0C9B\x0CCD	4-16	# KANNADA LETTER CHA
always   \x0C9C\x0CCD	4-245	# KANNADA LETTER JA
always   \x0C9D\x0CCD	4-356	# KANNADA LETTER JHA
always   \x0C9E\x0CCD	4-25	# KANNADA LETTER NYA

always   \x0C9F\x0CCD	4-23456  # KANNADA LETTER TTA
always   \x0CA0\x0CCD	4-2456	# KANNADA LETTER TTHA
always   \x0CA1\x0CCD	4-1246	# KANNADA LETTER DDA
always   \x0CA2\x0CCD	4-123456	# KANNADA LETTER DDHA
always   \x0CA3\x0CCD	4-3456	# KANNADA LETTER NNA

always   \x0CA4\x0CCD	4-2345	# KANNADA LETTER TA
always   \x0CA5\x0CCD	4-1456	# KANNADA LETTER THA
always   \x0CA6\x0CCD	4-145	# KANNADA LETTER DA
always   \x0CA7\x0CCD	4-2346	# KANNADA LETTER DHA
always   \x0CA8\x0CCD	4-1345	# KANNADA LETTER NA

always   \x0CAA\x0CCD	4-1234	# KANNADA LETTER PA
always   \x0CAB\x0CCD	4-235	# KANNADA LETTER PHA
always   \x0CAC\x0CCD	4-12	# KANNADA LETTER BA
always   \x0CAD\x0CCD	4-45	# KANNADA LETTER BHA
always   \x0CAE\x0CCD	4-134	# KANNADA LETTER MA

always   \x0CAF\x0CCD	4-13456	# KANNADA LETTER YA
always   \x0CB0\x0CCD	4-1235	# KANNADA LETTER RA
always   \x0CB2\x0CCD	4-123	# KANNADA LETTER LA
always   \x0CB3\x0CCD	4-456	# KANNADA LETTER LLA
always   \x0CB5\x0CCD	4-1236	# KANNADA LETTER VA
always   \x0CB6\x0CCD	4-146	# KANNADA LETTER SHA
always   \x0CB7\x0CCD	4-12346	# KANNADA LETTER SSA
always   \x0CB8\x0CCD	4-234	# KANNADA LETTER SA
always   \x0CB9\x0CCD	4-125	# KANNADA LETTER HA
always   \x0CC4\x0CCD	4-6-1235	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC RR

#ksha and gya
always \x0C95\x0CCD\x0CB7\x0CCD	4-12345	#ksha
always \x0C95\x0CCD\x0CB7	12345	#ksha
always \x0C9C\x0CCD\x0C9E\x0CCD	4-156	#gya
always \x0C9C\x0CCD\x0C9E	156	#gya

# za
always \x0C9C\x0CBC 1356

# fa
noback always \x0CAB\x0CBC 124 # needs special treatment to backtranslate, see above.

# To ensure correct form of vowel (letter or sign) in backtranslation
# if beginning of word: letters
sufword \x0C85	1	# KANNADA LETTER A
sufword \x0C86	345	# KANNADA LETTER AA
sufword \x0C87	24	# KANNADA LETTER I
sufword \x0C88	35	# KANNADA LETTER II
sufword \x0C89	136	# KANNADA LETTER U
sufword \x0C8A	1256	# KANNADA LEETER UU
sufword \x0C8B	5-1235	# KANNADA LETTER VOCALIC R
sufword \x0CE0	6-1235	# KANNADA LETTER VOCALIC RR
sufword \x0C8E	26	# KANNADA LETTER E
sufword \x0C8F	15	# KANNADA LETTER EE
sufword \x0C90	34	# KANNADA LETTER AI
sufword \x0C92	1346	# KANNADA LETTER O
sufword \x0C93	135	# KANNADA LETTER OO
sufword \x0C94	246	# KANNADA LETTER AU
# otherwise: signs
always \x0CBE	345	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN AA
always \x0CBF	24	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN I
always \x0CC0	35	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN II = OCBF ?  0CD5 ?
always \x0CC1	136	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN U
always \x0CC2	1256	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN UU
always \x0CC3	5-1235	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC R
always \x0CC4	6-1235	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC RR
always \x0CC6	26	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN E
always \x0CC7	15	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN EE = 0CC6 ? 0CD5 ?
always \x0CC8	34	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN AI =  0CC6 ? 0CD6 ?
always \x0CCA	1346	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN O = 0CC6 ?  0CD6 ?
always \x0CCB	135	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN OO = 0CCA ? 0CD5 ?
always \x0CCC	246	# KANNADA VOWEL SIGN AU

# consonant followed by vowel
attribute KannadaVowel \x0C87\x0C88\x0C89\x0C8A\x0C8B\x0C8E\x0C8F\x0C90\x0C92\x0C93\x0C94
attribute Halant \x0CCD
before KannadaVowel always      \x0C95   13-1	# KANNADA LETTER KA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0C96 	  46-1         # KANNADA LETTER KHA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0C97	   1245-1	# KANNADA LETTER GA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0C98	    126-1	# KANNADA LETTER GHA

before KannadaVowel always   \x0C9A 	 14-1	# KANNADA LETTER CA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0C9B 	 16-1	# KANNADA LETTER CHA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0C9C 	 245-1	# KANNADA LETTER JA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0C9D 	 356-1	# KANNADA LETTER JHA

before KannadaVowel always   \x0C9F 		 23456-1	# KANNADA LETTER TTA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0CA0 	 2456-1	 # KANNADA LETTER TTHA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0CA1 	 1246-1	 # KANNADA LETTER DDA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0CA2 	 123456-1	# KANNADA LETTER DDHA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0CA3 	 3456-1	# KANNADA LETTER NNA

before KannadaVowel always   \x0CA4 	 2345-1	# KANNADA LETTER TA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0CA5 	 1456-1	# KANNADA LETTER THA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0CA6 	 145-1	# KANNADA LETTER DA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0CA7 	 2346-1	# KANNADA LETTER DHA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0CA8 	 1345-1	# KANNADA LETTER NA

before KannadaVowel always   \x0CAA 	 1234-1	# KANNADA LETTER PA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0CAB 	 235-1	# KANNADA LETTER PHA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0CAC 	 12-1	# KANNADA LETTER BA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0CAD 	 45-1	# KANNADA LETTER BHA
before KannadaVowel always   \x0CAE 	 134-1	# KANNADA LETTER MA
